Utah statutes.
62A-4a-250.   Separate programs and procedures for minors committed to the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services on grounds other than abuse or neglect -- Attorney general responsibility.

(1)  On or before July 1, 1998, the division shall have established programs designed to meet the needs of minors who have not been adjudicated as abused or neglected, but who are otherwise committed to the custody of the division by the juvenile court pursuant to Section 78A-6-117, and who are classified in the division's management information system as having been placed in custody primarily on the basis of delinquent behavior or a status offense.

(2) (a)  The processes and procedures designed to meet the needs of children who are abused or neglected, described in Part 2 and in Title 78A, Chapter 6, Part 3, Abuse, Neglect, and Dependency Proceedings, are not applicable to the minors described in Subsection (1).

(b)  The procedures described in Subsection 78A-6-118(2)(a) are applicable to the minors described in Subsection (1).

(3)  As of July 1, 1998, the attorney general's office has the responsibility to represent the division with regard to actions involving minors described in Subsection (1).  Nothing in this section may be construed to affect the responsibility of the county attorney or district attorney to represent the state in those matters, in accordance with Section 78A-6-115.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

